Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2401
Drugs; adulteration; what constitutes.

For the purpose of section 71-2404, an article, in the case of drugs, shall be deemed adulterated (1) if, when a drug is sold under or by the name recognized in the United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary, it differs from the standard of strength, quality or purity as determined by the test laid down in the United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary official at the time of investigation; Provided, no drug defined in the United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary shall be deemed to be adulterated under this provision if the standard of strength or purity is plainly stated upon the bottle, box or other container thereof, although the standard may differ from that determined by the test laid down in the United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary; or (2) if its strength or purity falls below the professed standard of quality under which it is sold.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 9, p. 560;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-928;

R.S.1943, § 81-620.